Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB926.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5328(a)(14) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended April 15, 2024 (P.L.24, No.8) is amended to read:§ 5328. Factors to consider when awarding custody.(a) Factors.--In ordering any form of custody, the court shall determine the best interest of the child by considering all relevant factors, giving substantial weighted consideration to the factors specified under paragraphs (1), (2), (2.1) and (2.2) which affect the safety of the child, including the following:* * *(14) The history of drug or alcohol abuse of a party or member of a party's household. A party's lawful use of 123456789101112131415161718 medical marijuana under the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, alone is not enough evidence to determine child custody or require a party to undergo a drug test.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0926PN1058 - 2 - 123456